Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-811
Losses; arbitration of claims; copy of award furnished.

Any such association may provide in its bylaws for arbitrating any claim for loss or damage, where a member and the association fail to agree thereon. A copy of any adjustment or arbitration award on any claim for loss or damage shall be furnished the policyholder by the adjuster immediately when signed by the loss claimant.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 133, p. 465;

R.S.1913, § 3270;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. X, § 10, p. 646;

C.S.1922, § 7869;

C.S.1929, § 44-910;

R.S.1943, § 44-811;

Laws 1947, c. 166, § 1, p. 474.